Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2700.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title of the act of December 17, 1959 (P.L.1913, No.694), known as the Equal Pay Law, is amended to read:AN ACTProhibiting discrimination in rate of pay because of sex; requiring certain employers to disclose wage and benefit information in job listings and offers of employment; conferring powers and imposing duties on the Department of Labor and Industry; and prescribing penalties.Section 2. Section 2 of the act is amended by adding definitions to read:123456789101112131415161718192021 Section 2. Definitions.--* * *(g) The term "covered employer" means an employer that employs fifteen or more individuals for wages, remuneration or other compensation. The term includes an agent of the employer.(h) The term "job listing" means an advertisement of a job opening, in a printed or electronic medium, that an employer or agent of an employer publishes to solicit or encourage an individual to apply for the advertised job. The term includes an advertisement for a position offered as an internal transfer or promotion.(i) The term "prospective employe" means an individual who applies for, is a candidate for or receives an offer of employment for a position with a covered employer, whether or not a job listing advertises the position. The term includes an individual employed by a covered employer who applies for, is a candidate for or receives an offer of employment for a position offered as an internal transfer or promotion.Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 3.1. Disclosure of Wage and Benefit Information.--(a) A covered employer shall include in each job listing a written disclosure containing all of the following:(1) A description of each medical, dental or vision benefit, if offered, that will be available to the prospective employe upon commencement of employment in the advertised position, including all of the following:(i) The premium or other periodic cost of coverage, the portion of the cost paid by the covered employer and the portion of the cost paid by the employe, stated as a dollar amount or percentage.(ii) Any deductible, copayment, coinsurance or annual out-20260HB2700PN3778 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of-pocket maximum applicable to the benefit.(iii) The name of the plan, provider network or plan administrator, if any.(iv) Any waiting period or other condition of eligibility f or the benefit. (2) A description of each life insurance benefit, if offered, including the death benefit or face value of the policy and any employe contribution required.(3) A description of each retirement or deferred compensation benefit, if offered, including the type of plan, the maximum annual employer contribution or the formula by which the employer contribution is determined, any schedule under which employer contributions vest and any waiting period or other condition of eligibility for the benefit.(4) If the covered employer does not offer a benefit under clause (1), (2) or (3), a clear and conspicuous statement identifying each benefit not offered.(b) A covered employer shall provide a prospective employe with a written disclosure containing all of the following when the covered employer makes an offer of employment:(1) The annual salary or hourly wage offered.(2) A statement as to whether the position is classified as exempt or nonexempt from overtime compensation requirements and, if the position is nonexempt, a statement that the prospective employe will be paid at the stated rate for all hours worked and at not less than one and one-half times the prospective employe's regular rate for each hour worked in excess of forty hours in a workweek as provided by law.(3) A copy of the summary plan description required under 29 U.S.C. § 1022 (relating to summary plan description) for each 20260HB2700PN3778 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employe benefit plan in which the prospective employe would be eligible to participate.(4) For each benefit specified under subsection (a) for which a summary plan description is not required under 29 U.S.C. § 1022, a written explanation of the benefit in a form and manner that the secretary requires.(c) A disclosure required under subsection (a) may appear in the body of the job listing or, for an electronic job listing, by prominent hyperlink or Internet website address included in the job listing that connects directly to the disclosure. The disclosure shall be accurate as of the date the job listing is first published and shall remain accessible while the job listing remains published.(d) This section shall apply to a job listing for and an offer of employment for a position that will be performed in whole or in part in this Commonwealth, including a position that may be performed remotely by an individual located in this Commonwealth.(e) For the purposes of this section, the term "employe" includes a person subject to 29 U.S.C. § 206 (relating to minimum wage).Section 4. Section 8(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 8. Penalties.--(a) [Any] Except as provided under section 8.1, any employer who wilfully and knowingly violates any provisions of this act, or who discharges or in any other manner discriminates against any employe because such employe has made any complaint to his employer, the secretary or any other person who instituted or caused to be instituted any proceeding under or related to this act, or has testified or is about to testify in any such proceedings, shall, upon conviction 20260HB2700PN3778 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 thereof in a summary proceeding, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200), and, upon default in such fine and costs, shall undergo imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than sixty days. Each day such a violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.* * *Section 5. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 8.1. Penalties for Nondisclosure of Wage and Benefit Information.--(a) A covered employer that publishes or causes to be published a job listing that fails to include the disclosures required under section 3.1(a) shall, upon conviction thereof in a summary proceeding, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than three hundred dollars ($300). Each day that the job listing remains published without the required disclosures shall constitute a separate offense.(b) A covered employer that makes an offer of employment without providing the disclosures required under section 3.1(b) shall, upon conviction thereof in a summary proceeding, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000).(c) Before instituting a proceeding under subsection (a) for a covered employer's first violation of section 3.1(a), the secretary shall provide the covered employer with written notice of the violation. A covered employer shall not be subject to a fine for a first violation if the covered employer corrects the violation or withdraws the job listing within fourteen days after receipt of the notice.(d) Any person may report a suspected violation of section 3.1 to the secretary. The secretary may institute or cause to be 20260HB2700PN3778 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 instituted summary proceedings under this section.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20260HB2700PN3778 - 6 - 12